Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202670-1028.02
Electric supplier; operation of direct-current, fast-charging station; requirements.

(1) Effective on January 1, 2028, an electric supplier shall not develop, own, maintain, or operate a direct-current, fast-charging station within ten miles of a privately owned direct-current fast-charging station that is already in commercial operation or has a pending building permit and interconnection request to the electric supplier, on January 1, 2028.

(2) An electric supplier that operates a direct-current, fast-charging station shall provide electric vehicle charging under rates, tolls, rents, and charges that are fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory, and available to all direct-current, fast-charging station operators in the electric supplier's service territory for the purpose of operating direct-current, fast-charging stations.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 68.